Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1758.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 12 O.S. 2021, Section 993, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 993. A. When an order:


1. Discharges, vacates, or modifies or refuses to discharge,


vacate, or modify an attachment;


2. Denies a temporary or permanent injunction, grants a


temporary or permanent injunction except where granted at an ex


parte hearing, or discharges, vacates, or modifies or refuses to


discharge, vacate, or modify a temporary or permanent injunction;


3. Discharges, vacates, or modifies or refuses to discharge,


vacate, or modify a provisional remedy which affects the substantial


rights of a party;

Req. No. 3169 Page 1


4. Appoints a receiver except where the receiver was appointed


at an ex parte hearing, refuses to appoint a receiver, or vacates or


refuses to vacate the appointment of a receiver;


5. Directs the payment of money pendente lite except where


granted at an ex parte hearing, refuses to direct the payment of


money pendente lite, or vacates or refuses to vacate an order


directing the payment of money pendente lite;


6. Certifies or refuses to certify an action to be maintained


as a class action;


7. Denies a motion in a class action asserting lack of


jurisdiction because an agency of this state has exclusive or


primary jurisdiction of the action or a part of the action, or


asserting that a party has failed to exhaust administrative


remedies, but only if the class is subsequently certified and only


as part of the appeal of the order certifying the class action; or


8. Grants a new trial or opens or vacates a judgment or order,


the party aggrieved thereby may appeal the order to the Supreme


Court without awaiting the final determination in said cause, by


filing the petition in error and the record on appeal with the


Supreme Court within thirty (30) days after the order prepared in


conformance with Section 696.3 of this title, is filed with the


court clerk. If the appellant did not prepare the order, and


Section 696.2 of this title required a copy of the order to be


mailed to the appellant, and the court records do not reflect the

Req. No. 3169 Page 2


mailing of a copy of the order to the appellant within three (3)


days, exclusive of weekends and holidays, after the filing of the


order, the petition in error may be filed within thirty (30) days


after the earliest date on which the court records show that a copy


of the order was mailed to the appellant. The Supreme Court may


extend the time for filing the record upon good cause shown.


B. If the order discharges or modifies an attachment or


temporary injunction and it becomes operative, the undertaking given


upon the allowance of an attachment or temporary injunction shall


stay the enforcement of said order and remain in full force until


final order of discharge shall take effect.


C. If a receiver shall be or has been appointed, upon the


appellant filing an appeal bond, with sufficient sureties, in such


sum as may have been required of the receiver by the court or a


judge thereof, conditioned for the due prosecution of the appeal and


the payment of all costs or damages that may accrue to the state or


any officer or person by reason thereof, the authority of the


receiver shall be suspended until the final determination of the


appeal, and if the receiver has taken possession of any property,


real or personal, it shall be returned and surrendered to the


appellant upon the filing and approval of the bonds.


D. In addition to other appeals authorized by law, a party may


appeal from any of the following interlocutory orders:



Req. No. 3169 Page 3


1. An order that grants, modifies, denies, or refuses a


temporary order in any suit affecting the parent-child relationship,


including, but not limited to, temporary orders regarding:


a. conservatorship or legal custody,


b. possession or visitation,


c. child support or spousal support,


d. protective orders involving a parent or child, and


e. the rights and duties of a parent;


2. A notice of appeal pursuant to this subsection shall be


filed within twenty (20) days of the date the temporary order is


signed;


3. Upon a showing of good cause, including, but not limited to,


lack of notice or representation at the time of the order, the


appellate court shall extend the time for filing a notice of appeal


pursuant to this subsection by no more than ten (10) additional


days;


4. An appeal pursuant to this subsection shall be given


priority status by the appellate court. The court shall expedite


briefing and render a decision as promptly as practicable; and


5. An appeal pursuant to this subsection shall not stay


proceedings in the trial court unless the appellate court orders a


stay.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 3169 Page 4


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3169 CN 1/14/2026 3:03:23 PM









































Req. No. 3169 Page 5